Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201472-271
Production of wind or solar energy; agreements; terms, defined.

For
purposes of sections 72-270 to 72-274:

(1) Agreement means (a)
for purposes of a solar energy system, a solar agreement as defined in section
66-909 and (b) for purposes of a wind energy conversion system, a wind agreement
as defined in section 66-909.04;

(2) Board means the Board
of Educational Lands and Funds;

(3) Lessee means any individual, corporation, or other entity that enters
into an agreement with the board;

(4) Solar energy means radiant energy, direct, diffuse, or reflected,
received from the sun at wavelengths suitable for conversion into thermal,
chemical, or electrical energy; and

(5) Wind energy has the definition found in section 66-909.01.

Laws 2010, LB235, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB828, § 12.